Rhode Island, session 2025, SB922.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-7.1-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-7.1 entitled "The Paul
W. Crowley Rhode Island Student Investment Initiative [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode
Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-7.1-5. Intervention and support for failing schools. Intervention and support for
individual schools.
(a) The board of regents shall adopt a series of progressive support and intervention
strategies consistent with the Comprehensive Education Strategy and the principles of the “School
Accountability for Learning and Teaching” (SALT) of the board of regents for those schools and
school districts that continue to fall short of performance goals outlined in the district strategic
plans. These strategies shall initially focus on:
(1) technical assistance in improvement planning, curriculum alignment, student
assessment, instruction, and family and community involvement;
(2) policy support;
(3) resource oversight to assess and recommend that each school has adequate resources
necessary to meet performance goal; and
(4) creating supportive partnerships with education institutions, business, governmental, or
other appropriate nonprofit agencies. If after a three (3) year period of support there has not been
improvement in the education of students as determined by objective criteria to be developed by

the board of regents, then there shall be progressive levels of control by the department of
elementary and secondary education over the school and/or district budget, program, and/or
personnel. This control by the department of elementary and secondary education may be exercised
in collaboration with the school district and the municipality. If further needed, the school shall be
reconstituted. Reconstitution responsibility is delegated to the board of regents and may range from
restructuring the school’s governance, budget, program, personnel, and/or may include decisions
regarding the continued operation of the school. The board of regents shall assess the district’s
capacity and may recommend the provision of additional district, municipal and/or state resources.
If a school or school district is under the board of regents’ control as a result of actions taken by
the board pursuant to this section, the local school committee shall be responsible for funding that
school or school district at the same level as in the prior academic year increased by the same
percentage as the state total of school aid is increased.
(b) For FY 2007, the department shall dedicate one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
from funds appropriated to support progressive support and intervention and SALT visits to support
the Rhode Island Consortium for Instructional Leadership and Training. This consortium is
engaged in training school leaders to be more effective instructional leaders in the standards based
instruction environment. This intervention, support, and control by the department of elementary
and secondary education as authorized by this section may only be exercised in up to two (2)
schools within one school district at any given time. Provided, the provisions of this subsection
shall not apply to any such intervention, support, and control which has been initiated and is in
effect prior to or as of July 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC002640
========
LC002640 - Page 2 of 3